tables/de-g1-core.ctb
# liblouis: German grade 1 braille
#
#  Copyright (C) 2009 SBS Schweizerische Bibliothek für Blinde und Sehbehinderte
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#  DEUTSCHE VOLLSCHRIFT - German Grade 1 Braille
#
#  Version 11-17-09
#  christian.waldvogel@sbszh.ch
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


class i i
class u u

# AU
always au 16
always kapernaum 13-1-1234-12456-1345-1-136-134
always propaganda 1234-1235-135-1234-1-1245-1-1345-145-1
always europa 126-1235-135-1234-1
before u begmidword extra 15-1346-2345-1235-1
always galauniform 1245-1-123-1-136-1345-24-124-135-1235-134
before u begmidword intra 24-1345-2345-1235-1
always kamera 13-1-134-15-1235-1
always pharma 1234-125-1-1235-134-1

# ÄU
always äu 34
always skarabäus 234-13-1-1235-1-12-345-136-234
always thaddäus 2345-125-1-145-145-345-136-234
midendword igäum 24-1245-345-136-134
always apogäum 1-1234-135-1245-345-136-134
always trochäus 2345-1235-135-1456-345-136-234
always matthäus 134-1-2345-2345-125-345-136-234
always jubiläum 245-136-12-24-123-345-136-134
always ptolemäus 1234-2345-135-123-15-134-345-136-234
always bartimäus 12-1-1235-2345-24-134-345-136-234
always bartholomäus 12-1-1235-2345-125-135-123-135-134-345-136-234
always borromäus 12-135-1235-1235-135-134-345-136-234
always athenäum 1-2345-125-15-1345-345-136-134
always piräus 1234-24-1235-345-136-234

# CH
always ch 1456

# EI
always ei 146
midendword eideal 15-24-145-15-1-123
midendword eidee 15-24-145-15-15
begmidword getreidee 1245-15-2345-1235-146-145-15-15
begmidword getreideein 1245-15-2345-1235-146-145-15-146-1345
begmidword schneideein 156-1345-146-145-15-146-1345
midendword eidentifi 15-24-145-15-1345-2345-24-124-24
midendword eidentisch 15-24-145-15-1345-2345-24-156
midendword eidentität 15-24-145-15-1345-2345-24-2345-345-2345
midendword eideo 15-24-145-15-135
midendword eidyll 15-24-145-13456-123-123
midendword eignor 15-24-1245-1345-135-1235
midword eikon 15-24-13-135-1345
always reederei 1235-15-15-145-15-1235-146
always fischerei 124-24-156-15-1235-146
always molkerei 134-135-123-13-15-1235-146
always datei 145-1-2345-146
always polizei 1234-135-123-24-1356-146
begmidword freikon 124-1235-146-13-135-1345
begmidword parteikon 1234-1-1235-2345-146-13-135-1345
midendword eille 15-24-123-123-15
begmidword teillei 2345-146-123-123-146
midword eilleus 15-24-123-123-126-234
begmidword marseill 134-1-1235-234-15-24-123-123
midendword eilloy 15-24-123-123-135-13456
midendword eillu 15-24-123-123-136
midendword eimag 15-24-134-1-1245
always geheim 1245-15-125-146-134
midendword eimbiss 15-24-134-12-24-234-234
midendword eimit 15-24-134-24-2345
always arzneimittel 1-1235-1356-1345-146-134-24-2345-2345-15-123
always eimitgl 146-134-24-2345-1245-123
always eimitt 146-134-24-2345-2345
midendword eimker 15-24-134-13-15-1235
midendword eimm 15-24-134-134
always leim 123-146-134
always heim 125-146-134
midendword eimp 15-24-134-1234
always keim 13-146-134
always reimpaar 1235-146-134-1234-1-1-1235
# MACHNOCH: von G2: alle "EIN" abgleichen
midendword eindex 15-24-1345-145-15-1346
midendword eindik 15-24-1345-145-24-13
midendword eindio 15-24-1345-145-24-135
midendword eindiz 15-24-1345-145-24-1356
midendword einduk 15-24-1345-145-136-13
midendword eindust 15-24-1345-145-136-23456
midendword einduzier 15-24-1345-145-136-1356-346-1235
midword eineff 15-24-1345-15-124-124
midendword einfant 15-24-1345-124-1-1345-2345
midword einfark 15-24-1345-124-1-1235-13
midendword einfekt 15-24-1345-124-15-13-2345
midendword einfektion 15-24-1345-124-15-13-2345-24-135-1345
midword einfer 15-24-1345-124-15-1235
midword einfilt 15-24-1345-124-24-123-2345
midendword einfinit 15-24-1345-124-24-1345-24-2345
midword einfiz 15-24-1345-124-24-1356
midword einflat 15-24-1345-124-123-1-2345
midendword einfo 15-24-1345-124-135
always klein 13-123-146-1345
always schein 156-146-1345
always reinform 1235-146-1345-124-135-1235-134
midendword einfusion 15-24-1345-124-136-234-24-135-1345
midendword einhab 15-24-1345-125-1-12
midendword einhala 15-24-1345-125-1-123-1
midendword einhalier 15-24-1345-125-1-123-346-1235
midendword einhär 15-24-1345-125-345-1235
midendword einhomo 15-24-1345-125-135-134-135
midendword einhuman 15-24-1345-125-136-134-1-1345
midendword einit 15-24-1345-24-2345
midendword einj 15-24-1345-245
begmidword feinj 124-146-1345-245
midendword einkarn 15-24-1345-13-1-1235-1345
midendword einkasso 15-24-1345-13-1-234-234-135
midendword einklu 15-24-1345-13-123-136
midendword einkomp 15-24-1345-13-135-134-1234
midendword einkon 15-24-1345-13-135-1345
always wein 2456-146-1345
midendword einkub 15-24-1345-13-136-12
midendword einland 15-24-1345-123-1-1345-145
always stein 23456-146-1345
always rhein 1235-125-146-1345
midendword einnen 15-24-1345-1345-15-1345
midendword einner 15-24-1345-1345-15-1235
begmidword beinnerv 12-146-1345-1345-15-1235-1236
begmidword feinnerv 124-146-1345-1345-15-1235-1236
midendword einnov 15-24-1345-1345-135-1236
midendword einnung 15-24-1345-1345-136-1345-1245
midendword einput 15-24-1345-1234-136-2345
midendword einschrift 15-24-1345-156-1235-24-124-2345
always latein 123-1-2345-146-1345
always reinschrift 1235-146-1345-156-1235-24-124-2345
midendword einsekt 15-24-1345-234-15-13-2345
midendword einserat 15-24-1345-234-15-1235-1-2345
midendword einserent 15-24-1345-234-15-1235-15-1345-2345
midendword einserier 15-24-1345-234-15-1235-346-1235
midendword einsert 15-24-1345-234-15-1235-2345
midendword einsider 15-24-1345-234-24-145-15-1235
midendword einsign 15-24-1345-234-24-1245-1345
midendword einsist 15-24-1345-234-24-23456
midendword einsolv 15-24-1345-234-135-123-1236
midendword einspekt 15-24-1345-234-1234-15-13-2345
midendword einspir 15-24-1345-234-1234-24-1235
midendword einspiz 15-24-1345-234-1234-24-1356
midendword einstabil 15-24-1345-23456-1-12-24-123
midendword einstall 15-24-1345-23456-1-123-123
midendword einstanz 15-24-1345-23456-1-1345-1356
midendword einstinkt 15-24-1345-23456-24-1345-13-2345
midendword einstit 15-24-1345-23456-24-2345
midendword einstrument 15-24-1345-23456-1235-136-134-15-1345-2345
always feinstrumpf 124-146-1345-23456-1235-136-134-1234-124
midendword einsul 15-24-1345-234-136-123
midendword einszen 15-24-1345-234-1356-15-1345
midendword eintegr 15-24-1345-2345-15-1245-1235
midendword eintell 15-24-1345-2345-15-123-123
midendword eintend 15-24-1345-2345-15-1345-145
always allgemein 1-123-123-1245-15-134-146-1345
midendword eintens 15-24-1345-2345-15-1345-234
midendword eintent 15-24-1345-2345-15-1345-2345
midendword einter 15-24-1345-2345-15-1235
always gemein 1245-15-134-146-1345
always geeinter 1245-15-146-1345-2345-15-1235
always vereinter 1236-15-1235-146-1345-2345-15-1235
always vermeinter 1236-15-1235-134-146-1345-2345-15-1235
always verneinter 1236-15-1235-1345-146-1345-2345-15-1235
midendword eintol 15-24-1345-2345-135-123
midendword eintra 15-24-1345-2345-1235-1
always eintracht 146-1345-2345-1235-1-1456-2345
always eintraf 146-1345-2345-1235-1-124
always eintrag 146-1345-2345-1235-1-1245
always eintrat 146-1345-2345-1235-1-2345
always eintraust 146-1345-2345-1235-16-23456
always eintraut 146-1345-2345-1235-16-2345
midendword eintrig 15-24-1345-2345-1235-24-1245
midendword eintro 15-24-1345-2345-1235-135
always eintrock 146-1345-2345-1235-135-14-13
always eintromm 146-1345-2345-1235-135-134-134
always eintropf 146-1345-2345-1235-135-1234-124
midendword eintui 15-24-1345-2345-136-24
midendword einvalid 15-24-1345-1236-1-123-24-145
midendword einvasion 15-24-1345-1236-1-234-24-135-1345
midendword einvent 15-24-1345-1236-15-1345-2345
midendword einvert 15-24-1345-1236-15-1235-2345
always alleinver 1-123-123-146-1345-1236-15-1235
always feinver 124-146-1345-1236-15-1235
always scheinver 156-146-1345-1236-15-1235
always rhein 1235-125-146-1345
midendword einvest 15-24-1345-1236-15-23456
midendword eion 15-24-135-1345
midendword eirr 15-24-1235-1235
midendword eisolat 15-24-234-135-123-1-2345
midendword eisolier 15-24-234-135-123-346-1235
midendword eiterier 15-24-2345-15-1235-346-1235
midendword eiterat 15-24-2345-15-1235-1-2345
always beijing 12-15-24-245-24-1345-1245
begmidword beimpf 12-15-24-134-1234-124
always beinhalt 12-15-24-1345-125-1-123-2345
always beirr 12-15-24-1235-1235
always deifikation 145-15-24-124-24-13-1-2345-24-135-1345
always deindividuation 145-15-24-1345-145-24-1236-24-145-136-1-2345-24-135-1345
always deist 145-15-24-23456
always badeinsel 12-1-145-15-24-1345-234-15-123
sufword fidei 124-24-145-15-24
always codein 14-135-145-15-24-1345
always kodein 13-135-145-15-24-1345
midendword deist 145-15-24-23456
midendword deistisch 145-15-24-23456-24-156
always schnee 156-1345-15-15
always seeigel 234-15-15-24-1245-15-123
always sightseeing 234-24-1245-125-2345-234-15-15-24-1345-1245
midendword eeinsel 15-15-24-1345-234-15-123
midendword seeisch 234-15-15-24-156
always coffein 14-135-124-124-15-24-1345
always koffein 13-135-124-124-15-24-1345
midendword geinhalt 1245-15-24-1345-125-1-123-2345
begmidword geirr 1245-15-24-1235-1235
begmidword geimpf 1245-15-24-134-1234-124
always eheinstitut 15-125-15-24-1345-23456-24-2345-136-2345
always prometheisch 1234-1235-135-134-15-2345-125-15-24-156
always theismus 2345-125-15-24-234-134-136-234
always theist 2345-125-15-24-23456
before i begmidword kohle 13-135-125-123-15
always leim 123-146-134
always galilei 1245-1-123-24-123-15-24
always nuklein 1345-136-13-123-15-24-1345
always acrolein 1-14-1235-135-123-15-24-1345
always akrolein 1-13-1235-135-123-15-24-1345
before i begmidword wärme 2456-345-1235-134-15
always schweineigel 156-2456-146-1345-15-24-1245-15-123
always äneis 345-1345-15-24-234
always aeneis 1-15-1345-15-24-234
midendword aneität 1-1345-15-24-2345-345-2345
sufword alineier 1-123-24-1345-15-346-1235
always guineisch 1245-136-24-1345-15-24-156
always boeing 12-135-15-24-1345-1245
always nereide 1345-15-1235-15-24-145-15
always kreier 13-1235-15-346-1235
always pythagoreisch 1234-13456-2345-125-1-1245-135-1235-15-24-156
always epikureisch 15-1234-24-13-136-1235-15-24-156
always eritreisch 15-1235-24-2345-1235-15-24-156
always kureismus 13-136-1235-15-24-234-134-136-234
always diagnose 145-24-1-1245-1345-135-234-15
always kasein 13-1-234-15-24-1345
before i begmidword kälte 13-345-123-2345-15
always protein 1234-1235-135-2345-15-24-1345
always weight 2456-15-24-1245-125-2345
